California, session 20252026, SB488.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65302.6 of the Government Code is amended to read:65302.6. (a) A city, county, or a city and county may adopt with its safety element pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 65302 a local hazard mitigation plan (HMP) specified in the federal Disaster Mitigation Act of 2000 (Public Law 106-390). The hazard mitigation plan shall include all of the following elements called for in the federal act requirements:(1) An initial earthquake performance evaluation of public facilities that provide essential services, shelter, and critical governmental functions.(2) An inventory of private facilities that are potentially hazardous, including, but not limited to, multiunit, soft story, concrete tilt-up, and concrete frame buildings.(3) A plan to reduce the potential risk from private and governmental facilities in the event of a disaster.(b) Local The Office of Emergency Services shall give preference to local jurisdictions that have not adopted a local hazard mitigation plan shall be given preference by the Office of Emergency Services in recommending actions to be funded from the Pre-Disaster Mitigation Program, the Hazard Mitigation Grant Program, and the Flood Mitigation Assistance Program to assist the local jurisdiction in developing and adopting a local hazard mitigation plan, subject to available funding from the Federal Emergency Management Agency.